Hawaii statutes.
§353D-4 Advisory council. There is
established within the department for administrative purposes an offender
family service center program advisory council. The council shall consist of
seven members, of whom two shall be offender family members. The members of
the council shall be appointed by the director of public safety in consultation
with private secular and religious organizations. The council may review and
make recommendations to the director to improve the services rendered by the
center. [L 1987, c 251, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 141, §34; am L 1991, c 3, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next